Wisconsin, session 2025, SB505.
do enact as follows:SB505,11Section 1. 29.173 (2) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB505,2,10229.173 (2) (c) A disabled veteran holding a current resident deer hunting 3license may hunt deer of either sex during any season open to hunting of deer with 4firearms that is established by the department. For purposes of this paragraph, a 5disabled veteran is a resident who produces evidence that shows that he or she is a 6veteran, as defined in 38 USC 101, and is receiving disability compensation benefits 7under 38 USC 1101 to 1163 for disabilities that result in a disability rating that is 850 percent or greater under 38 USC 1114 or 1134, or is receiving disability 9compensation benefits due to being individually unemployable under 38 CFR 4.16 10as authorized under 38 USC 501.SB505,2,1111